Georgia statutes. 
(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-36-22; Code 1981, § 36-36-32, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 27.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article questioning the constitutionality of this section, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 169 (1975). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

This section is not unconstitutional on the theory that the section attempts to delegate "legislative power," including the right to change municipal boundaries, to local governments. Niskey Lake Water Works, Inc. v. Garner, 228 Ga. 864, 188 S.E.2d 864 (1972).

Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-32) is a "general law" and provides a method of municipal annexation as contemplated by Ga. L. 1965, p. 298, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-35-2). Niskey Lake Water Works, Inc. v. Garner, 228 Ga. 864, 188 S.E.2d 864 (1972).

Best interest determinations. - Although finding that a city had not made a best interest determination as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-36-37(a), a trial court never held that the determination had to be made on the record; since the city's annexation evidence under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-35 was inadequate to assist the citizens in participating intelligently in the public hearing, the county was entitled to summary judgment under O.C.G.A. § 9-11-56. City of Riverdale v. Clayton County, 263 Ga. App. 672, 588 S.E.2d 845 (2003).

Comparison of 100 percent and 60 percent methods of annexation. - Requirements of the 100 percent method and the 60 percent method are different. In the 100 percent method, the land being annexed need only abut the municipal boundaries. In the 60 percent method, the land being annexed must coincide with the municipal boundaries on one-eighth of the municipality's aggregate external boundary. City of Marietta v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 237 Ga. 518, 228 S.E.2d 894 (1976).

Involvement of only one landowner does not prohibit use of 60 percent method. - When the procedures that must be followed in using the "60 percent method" were followed by the city in effecting an annexation, the fact that there was only one landowner involved and no electors involved in this annexation did not prohibit use of the "60 percent method" prescribed by statute. Niskey Lake Water Works, Inc. v. Garner, 228 Ga. 864, 188 S.E.2d 864 (1972).

The 60 percent method of annexation may be used in areas with no registered voters. Niskey Lake Water Works, Inc. v. Garner, 228 Ga. 864, 188 S.E.2d 864 (1972).

Removal of persons "resident in the area". - City had two options when the city found that 36 people were no longer "resident in the area." It could have challenged the names of the 36 people the city determined to be nonresidents and had the names removed from the list, or it could have sought others who were "resident in the area." City Council v. Richmond County, 259 Ga. 161, 377 S.E.2d 851 (1989).

When city discovered that 34 electors had moved and that two were no longer living in the area sought to be annexed, the city could not just subtract the 36 names that the city determined to be "nonresident in the area" from the total to arrive at the requisite 60 percent. City Council v. Richmond County, 259 Ga. 161, 377 S.E.2d 851 (1989).

City failed to comply with publishing requirements. - Trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of a county because the city failed to publish a notice as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-36-36(a) that accurately described the property to be annexed; thus, the city failed to comply, or to substantially comply, with the requirements of that statute. City of Lovejoy v. Clayton County, 335 Ga. App. 881, 783 S.E.2d 395 (2016).

Annexations properly invalidated. - Judgment invalidating the City of Atlanta's attempted annexation of five areas was affirmed because the trial court correctly held that the annexations were invalid since at the time the annexations would have become effective, the areas in question were already part of the newly incorporated City of South Fulton and, thus, ineligible for annexation by Atlanta. City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

Cited in Pharris v. Mayor of Jefferson, 226 Ga. 489, 175 S.E.2d 845 (1970); Pharris v. Mayor of Jefferson, 227 Ga. 32, 178 S.E.2d 863 (1970); City of Cartersville v. Bartow County Sch. Dist., 145 Ga. App. 129, 243 S.E.2d 293 (1978); City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Correctional institution site and adjoining property may be annexed by city in one procedure, upon application of appropriate persons, when property adjoining correctional institution abuts city limits. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 81-37.

Intent of General Assembly in referring to "the record title holder of the fee simple title" was to give the grantor of a security deed the right to decide upon the question of annexation. Thus, in determining ownership of land for the purpose of determining the eligibility of a landowner to sign an application for annexation to a municipality, it should be done without regard to whether such land is encumbered by an outstanding deed to secure debt. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-16.

It is the apparent legislative scheme to place decision as to annexation upon persons residing in area, rather than upon persons holding mere security interests in the property. 1972 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U72-105.

Need for voice of property owner to be heard. - Legislature did not intend for any property to be annexed to a municipal corporation without the owner of the property at least being allowed a voice on the question of such annexation. Of course, if the county or State School Building Authority (now Georgia Education Authority (Schools)) or some other governmental entity chooses not to make application for annexation, but at least 60 percent of the other owners of property in the area making application for annexation do apply, the statutory requirements are met irrespective of the wishes of some owners. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-236.

Governing body of a municipality does not have authority to annex a lesser included portion of territory described in an original application. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-253.

Landowners may withdraw their consent to any annexation petition at any time through the date of the public hearing on such petition. If these withdrawals result in a reduction of the percentage of the land represented below 60 percent of the total area of land to be annexed, the petition is thereby invalidated, and the municipality into which the land was to be annexed has no authority to continue with the annexation. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-62.

Municipal governing body must request a list of electors registered in particular area making application for annexation. When preparing the list, the board of registrars should determine those electors within that area as of the date on which the application for annexation was presented by the electors and property owners to the municipal governing body. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-236.

Annexation of state park. - Municipality must have specific legislative approval to annex state park. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-211.

Acreage of railroad rights of way, county owned property, creeks and rivers, and other similar land must be included in calculation of total acreage for which application for annexation is made. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-236.

Department of Offender Rehabilitation (now Corrections) lacks authority to apply for or consent to annexation of state owned real property. 1981 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 81-37.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 38 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 60 et seq., 73, 74, 80.

ALR. - Power to extend boundaries of municipal corporations, 64 A.L.R. 1335.

Power to detach land from municipal corporations, towns, or villages, 117 A.L.R. 267.

Capacity to attack the fixing or extension of municipal limits or boundary, 13 A.L.R.2d 1279, 17 A.L.R.5th 195.

Right of one governmental subdivision to challenge annexation proceedings by another such subdivision, 17 A.L.R.5th 195.

36-36-33. Annexation across county boundary lines prohibited.

Statute text

There shall be no annexation across the boundary lines of any county under this article.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 5; Ga. L. 1971, p. 399, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1011, § 2; Code 1981, § 36-36-23; Code 1981, § 36-36-33, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-23 as present Code Section 36-36-33.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Marietta v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 237 Ga. 518, 228 S.E.2d 894 (1976).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 53 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 63 et seq.

36-36-34. Determination of compliance with article; notice upon noncompliance; proceedings upon compliance.

Statute text

Whenever the governing body of a municipal corporation receives an application pursuant to Code Section 36-36-32, it shall, after investigation, determine whether such application complies with the requirements of this article. If it is determined that the application does not comply with this article, the governing body shall notify in writing the persons presenting the application, stating wherein the application is deficient. If it is determined that the application does comply with this article, the municipal governing body shall proceed to act on the application in accordance with Code Section 36-36-36.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 2; Code 1981, § 36-36-24; Code 1981, § 36-36-34, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

36-36-35. Plans and report for extension of services to area proposed to be annexed.

Statute text

(a) A municipal corporation exercising authority under this article shall make plans for the extension of services to the area proposed to be annexed and, prior to the public hearing provided for in Code Section 36-36-36, shall prepare a report setting forth its plans to provide services to the area.

(b) The report required in subsection (a) of this Code section shall include:

(1) A map or maps of the municipality and adjacent territory, showing the present and proposed boundaries of the municipal corporation, the present major trunk water mains and sewer interceptors and outfalls, and the proposed extensions of such mains and outfalls as required in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section; and

(2) A statement setting forth the plans of the municipal corporation for extending to the area to be annexed each major municipal service performed within the municipality at the time of annexation.

(c) The plans required in subsection (a) of this Code section shall:

(1) Provide for extending police protection, fire protection, garbage collection, and street maintenance services to the area to be annexed, on the date of annexation, on substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services are provided within the rest of the municipal corporation prior to annexation; but if a water distribution system is not available in the area to be annexed, the plans must call for reasonably effective fire protection services until such time as water lines are made available in the area under existing municipal policies for the extension of water lines; and

(2) Provide for extension of major trunk water mains and sewer outfall lines into the area to be annexed within 12 months of the effective date of annexation, so that when such lines are constructed property owners in the area to be annexed will be able to secure public water and sewer service, according to the policies in effect in such municipal corporation for extending water and sewer lines to individual lots or subdivisions.

(d) The report required in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be prepared and made available to the public at least 14 days prior to the public hearing required by Code Section 36-36-36.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 6; Code 1981, § 36-36-25; Code 1981, § 36-36-35, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Adequacy of evidence. - Although finding that a city had not made a best interest determination as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-36-37(a), a trial court never held that the determination had to be made on the record; since the city's annexation evidence under O.C.G.A. § 36-36-35 was inadequate to assist the citizens in participating intelligently in the public hearing, the county was entitled to summary judgment under O.C.G.A. § 9-11-56. City of Riverdale v. Clayton County, 263 Ga. App. 672, 588 S.E.2d 845 (2003).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 87, 88.

ALR. - Liability of municipality for injury to lateral support in grading street, 44 A.L.R. 1494.

Duty of public utility to duplicate service, 52 A.L.R. 1111.

36-36-36. Requirement of public hearing; notice of time and place; persons entitled to be heard; right of property owner to withdraw consent.

Statute text

(a) The municipal governing body shall hold a public hearing on any application which has been determined to meet the requirements of this article. The hearing shall be held not less than 15 nor more than 45 days from the time the governing body makes a determination that the petition is valid. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given in writing to the persons presenting the application and shall be advertised once a week for two consecutive weeks immediately preceding the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipal corporation and in the area proposed for annexation.

(b) At the public hearing all persons resident or owning property in the municipal corporation or in the area proposed for annexation may be heard on the question of the annexation of the area by the municipal corporation.

(c) Any property owner or elector may withdraw his consent in writing postmarked or received within three business days after the public hearing required by this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-36-26; Code 1981, § 36-36-36, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Subsection (c) of O.C.G.A. § 36-36-26 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-36) does not prohibit electors from changing their minds. City Council v. Richmond County, 259 Ga. 161, 377 S.E.2d 851 (1989).

City failed to comply with publishing requirements. - Trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of a county because the city failed to publish a notice as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-36-36(a) that accurately described the property to be annexed; thus, the city failed to comply, or to substantially comply, with the requirements of that statute. City of Lovejoy v. Clayton County, 335 Ga. App. 881, 783 S.E.2d 395 (2016).

Annexations properly invalidated. - Judgment invalidating the City of Atlanta's attempted annexation of five areas was affirmed because the trial court correctly held that the annexations were invalid since at the time the annexations would have become effective, the areas in question were already part of the newly incorporated City of South Fulton and, thus, ineligible for annexation by Atlanta. City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Landowners may withdraw their consent to any annexation petition at any time through the date of public hearing on such petition. If these withdrawals result in a reduction of the percentage of the land represented below 60 percent of the total area of land to be annexed, the petition is thereby invalidated and the municipality into which the land was to be annexed has no authority to continue with the annexation. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-62.

Method of withdrawing signatures from petition. - Landowners wishing to withdraw their signatures from petitions requesting that a municipality annex a certain area may do so by timely notifying the governing authorities of the municipality in any manner reasonably calculated to inform those authorities of their decision to do so. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-66.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Estoppel to question validity of proceedings extending boundaries of municipality, 101 A.L.R. 581.

What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-36-37. Adoption of annexing ordinance.

Statute text

(a) If, after the public hearing, the governing body determines that the annexation to the municipal corporation of the area proposed in the application would be in the best interest of the residents and property owners of the area proposed for annexation and of the citizens of the municipal corporation, the area may be annexed to the municipal corporation by the adoption of an annexing ordinance.

(b) The annexing ordinance authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be adopted within 60 days following validation of the signature of the applicants.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 4; Code 1981, § 36-36-27; Code 1981, § 36-36-37, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Annexations properly invalidated. - Judgment invalidating the City of Atlanta's attempted annexation of five areas was affirmed because the trial court correctly held that the annexations were invalid since at the time the annexations would have become effective, the areas in question were already part of the newly incorporated City of South Fulton and, thus, ineligible for annexation by Atlanta. City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

Cited in City of Riverdale v. Clayton County, 263 Ga. App. 672, 588 S.E.2d 845 (2003).

36-36-38. Filing of identification of annexed property with county and Department of Community Affairs; applicability of municipal ad valorem taxes to annexed territory; effect of annexation.

Statute text

(a) When an application pursuant to Code Section 36-36-32 is acted upon by the municipal authorities and the land, by ordinance, is annexed to the municipal corporation, an identification of the annexed property shall be filed with the Department of Community Affairs and with the county in which the property is located in accordance with Code Section 36-36-3.

(b) Municipal ad valorem taxes shall not apply to property within the annexed territory until January 1 of the following year.

(c) When so annexed, such lands shall constitute a part of the lands within the corporate limits of the municipal corporation as completely and fully as if the limits had been marked and defined by local Act of the General Assembly.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 7; Code 1981, § 36-36-28; Code 1981, § 36-36-38, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 164, § 9.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City Council v. Richmond County, 259 Ga. 161, 377 S.E.2d 851 (1989).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 85 et seq., 104 et seq.

36-36-39. Filing of petition for declaratory judgment to determine validity of annexation; judicial review.

Statute text

(a) Within 30 days of the effective date of the ordinance annexing land to the municipal corporation, any resident elector of the area so annexed or of the municipal corporation or any property owner of such area or of the municipal corporation may bring a petition for declaratory judgment, in the superior court of the county of the legal situs of the annexing municipal corporation, to determine the validity, in accordance with this article, of the application and the municipal corporation's action thereon. Whenever such a petition is filed, the municipal governing body shall file with the court the record of their official actions in regard to such application and a certified copy of the annexing ordinance.

(b) The judgment of the court on any such petition may declare the annexation ordinance null and void upon a finding that the application and the municipal corporation's action thereon are not in substantial compliance with this article. Upon a finding that procedural defects or defects in the plan for service to the annexed area exist, the court, where possible, shall frame a judgment to perfect such defect and uphold the ordinance.

(c) Actions provided for in this Code section shall be in accordance with Chapter 4 of Title 9.

(d) Any aggrieved party may obtain a review of a final judgment under this Code section as is provided by law in other cases.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 9; Code 1981, § 36-36-29; Code 1981, § 36-36-39, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-29 as present Code Section 36-36-39.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Boards of education do not come within category of persons barred from attacking ordinances after 30 days. Plantation Pipe Line Co. v. City of Bremen, 227 Ga. 1, 178 S.E.2d 868 (1970); City of Marietta v. Cobb County Sch. Dist., 237 Ga. 518, 228 S.E.2d 894 (1976).

Annexations properly invalidated. - Judgment invalidating the City of Atlanta's attempted annexation of five areas was affirmed because the trial court correctly held that the annexations were invalid since at the time the annexations would have become effective, the areas in question were already part of the newly incorporated City of South Fulton and, thus, ineligible for annexation by Atlanta. City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

Cited in City of Lovejoy v. Clayton County, 335 Ga. App. 881, 783 S.E.2d 395 (2016).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 26 C.J.S., Declaratory Judgments, §§ 99, 100.

ALR. - Proper remedy or procedure for attacking legality of proceedings annexing territory to municipal corporation, 18 A.L.R.2d 1255.

36-36-40. Use of municipally owned utilities by residents of annexed territory.

Statute text

Nothing within this article shall prohibit the municipal corporation from requiring the residents of the newly annexed area to use utilities owned by the municipal corporation when they are available.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 409, § 8; Code 1981, § 36-36-30; Code 1981, § 36-36-40, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-30 as present Code Section 36-36-40.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

City may under proper authority annex territory under conditions applicable only to newly annexed territory. City of Midway v. Midway Nursing & Convalescent Ctr., Inc., 230 Ga. 77, 195 S.E.2d 452 (1973).

Cited in City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014); City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Duty of public utility to duplicate service, 52 A.L.R. 1111.

——————————

ARTICLE 4

ANNEXATION PURSUANT TO RESOLUTION AND REFERENDUM

Annotations

Cross references. - Time limit for reannexing property which has been deannexed by the General Assembly, § 36-35-2(b).

36-36-50. Purpose of article.

Statute text

It is declared to be the intention of the General Assembly in enacting this article to provide a method for annexing to municipal corporations areas which meet the legislative standards established by Code Section 36-36-54. This article is not intended to affect or restrict the present authority of the General Assembly to legislate regarding the annexation of any area contiguous to any municipal corporation in this state, nor to limit in any way the authority of the General Assembly to provide alternative methods for extending municipal boundaries. This article shall not affect legislation pending on July 1, 1970.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 10; Code 1981, § 36-36-40; Code 1981, § 36-36-50, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 10 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-36-50 and 36-36-61 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

Authority to annex noncontiguous property. - Since the authority of the General Assembly to annex municipal property is limited only by the state and federal constitutions, the General Assembly's annexation of municipal property which was not contiguous to lands owned by a city was valid, and, therefore, the city's annexation of property which was contiguous to that property was also valid. City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Annexation by local Act. - There is evidence of intent on part of General Assembly to retain authority to alter municipal boundaries through local Acts. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-59.

36-36-51. Legislative declaration of policy.

Statute text

It is declared to be the policy in this state:

(1) That municipal corporations are created for the purpose of providing local governmental services and for ensuring the health, safety, and welfare of persons and the protection of property in areas being used primarily for residential, commercial, industrial, and institutional purposes;

(2) That the orderly growth of municipal corporations, based on the need for municipal services and the ability of the municipal corporation to serve, is essential to the economic progress of the state and to the well-being of its urban citizens;

(3) That the extension of municipal boundaries to accomplish orderly growth should be in accordance with standards established by the General Assembly; and

(4) That any areas included within municipal boundaries under this article should receive all services provided by the annexing municipal corporation as soon as possible after coming within its boundaries.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 398, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-36-41; Code 1981, § 36-36-51, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-41 as present Code Section 36-36-51.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Brookhaven v. City of Chamblee, 329 Ga. App. 346, 765 S.E.2d 33 (2014); City of Atlanta v. Mays, 301 Ga. 367, 801 S.E.2d 1 (2017).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 1, 31 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 57.

36-36-52. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Contiguous area" means any area which, at the time annexation procedures are initiated, either abuts directly on the municipal boundary or is separated from the municipal boundary by a street or street right of way, a creek or river, the right of way of a railroad or other public service corporation, lands owned by the municipal corporation or some other political subdivision, or lands owned by this state.

(2) "Used for residential purposes" refers to any lot or tract five acres or less in size on which is constructed a habitable dwelling unit.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 8; Code 1981, § 36-36-42; Code 1981, § 36-36-52, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3, effective July 1, 1992, renumbered former Code Section 36-36-42 as present Code Section 36-36-52.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

Cited in City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 53 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 63 et seq.

36-36-53. Authorization of annexation generally.

Statute text

The governing body of any municipal corporation may extend the corporate limits of the municipal corporation to include any area which meets the standards of Code Section 36-36-56, under the conditions and procedure provided in this article and in accordance with the procedures provided in Article 1 of this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 398, § 2; Code 1981, § 36-36-43; Code 1981, § 36-36-53, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article suggesting that Ga. L. 1970, p. 426 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-40 et seq.) is not a satisfactory vehicle for urban annexation, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 169 (1975).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 35 et seq., 40, 44, 62.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 57, 59.

ALR. - Facts warranting extension or reduction of municipal boundaries, 62 A.L.R. 1011.

Power to extend boundaries of municipal corporations, 64 A.L.R. 1335.

Capacity to attack the fixing or extension of municipal limits or boundary, 13 A.L.R.2d 1279, 17 A.L.R.5th 195.

Right of one governmental subdivision to challenge annexation proceedings by another such subdivision, 17 A.L.R.5th 195.

36-36-54. Standards and requirements for area proposed to be annexed.

Statute text

(a) A municipal governing body may extend the municipal corporate limits to include any area:

(1) Which meets the general standards of subsection (b) of this Code section; and

(2) Every part of which meets the requirements of either subsection (c) or subsection (d) of this Code section.

(b) The total area to be annexed must meet the following standards on the date of the adoption of the resolution:

(1) It must be adjacent or contiguous to the municipal corporation's boundaries at the time the annexation proceeding is begun;

(2) At least one-eighth of the aggregate external boundaries of the area must coincide with the municipal boundary;

(3) No part of the area shall be included within the boundary of another municipal corporation or county; and

(4) No part of the area shall, at the time notice of public hearing is given in accordance with Code Section 36-36-57, be receiving either water service or sewer service, or both, and also either police protection or fire protection from any unit of government other than the municipal corporation proposing annexation. This requirement may be waived by written agreement of the municipal corporation proposing annexation and of the other unit of government affected. Where a waiver of this requirement is applicable, a copy of the agreement shall be made a part of the report required by Code Section 36-36-56. Where contracts exist between counties and municipal corporations, both government entities must agree by mutual consent prior to annexation.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, the area to be annexed must be developed for urban purposes. An area developed for urban purposes is defined as any area which, on the date of the adoption of the annexation resolution, has a total resident population equal to at least two persons for each acre of land included within its boundaries and is subdivided into lots and tracts such that at least 60 percent of the total acreage consists of lots and tracts five acres or less in size and such that at least 60 percent of the total number of lots and tracts are one acre or less in size.

(d) In addition to areas developed for urban purposes, a governing body may include in the area to be annexed any area which does not meet the requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section if such area lies between the municipal boundary and an area developed for urban purposes such that the area developed for urban purposes is either not adjacent to the municipal boundary or cannot be served by the municipal corporation without extending services and water and sewer lines through the sparsely developed area and, if such area is adjacent, on at least 60 percent of its external boundary to any combination of the municipal boundary and the boundary of an area or areas developed for urban purposes as defined in subsection (c) of this Code section.

(e) In fixing new municipal boundaries, a municipal governing body shall, wherever practical, use natural topographic features, such as ridge lines, streams, and creeks, as boundaries. If a street is used as a boundary, the governing body shall, wherever practical, include within the municipal corporation land on both sides of the street; such outside boundary may not extend more than 200 feet beyond the right of way of the street, except to include all of a lot or parcel of land partially within 200 feet of the right of way.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 4; Code 1981, § 36-36-44; Code 1981, § 36-36-54, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

Amount of land annexed. - Removal of a small portion of the land to be annexed to a city did not void the county's approval with respect to the remaining land. H-B Props., Ltd. v. City of Roswell, 247 Ga. App. 851, 545 S.E.2d 37 (2001).

Boundaries of annexed area. - Annexed territory need conform to suggested boundaries only "whenever practical," which indicates that such limitations on the establishment of boundaries are more directory than mandatory; thus, the fact that the boundaries of an annexed area did not correspond to natural topographic features and that a portion of the annexed area bounded by two roads did not encompass both sides of the street did not violate the statute as the annexation boundaries were based on voting precincts, which satisfied practical concerns with regard to identifying persons eligible to vote in the referendum and also a desire to annex land by neighborhoods. H-B Props., Ltd. v. City of Roswell, 247 Ga. App. 851, 545 S.E.2d 37 (2001).

Cited in City of Ft. Oglethorpe v. Boger, 267 Ga. 485, 480 S.E.2d 186 (1997).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 49 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 63 et seq.

ALR. - What land is contiguous or adjacent to municipality so as to be subject to annexation, 49 A.L.R.3d 589.

36-36-55. Determination of compliance with standards and requirements; review of determination by superior court.

Statute text

In determining population and degree of land subdivision for purposes of meeting the requirements of Code Section 36-36-54, the municipal corporation shall use methods calculated to provide reasonably accurate results. In determining, on appeal to the superior court, whether the standards set forth in Code Section 36-36-54 have been met, the reviewing court shall accept the estimates of the municipal corporation:

(1) As to population, if the estimate is based on the number of dwelling units in the area multiplied by the average family size in the area or in the county or counties of which the area is a part, as determined by the last preceding federal census or based on a new enumeration carried out under reasonable rules and regulations by the annexing municipal corporation, provided that the court shall not accept such estimates if the petitioner on appeal demonstrates that the estimates are in error in the amount of 10 percent or more;

(2) As to total area, if the estimate is based on an actual survey, on county tax maps or records, on aerial photographs, or on some other reasonably reliable map used for official purposes by a governmental agency, unless the petitioner on appeal demonstrates that the estimates are in error in the amount of 5 percent or more; and

(3) As to degree of land subdivision, if the estimates are based on an actual survey, on county tax maps or records, on aerial photographs, or on some other reasonably reliable source, unless the petitioner on appeal shows that the estimates are in error in the amount of 5 percent or more.

History

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 9; Code 1981, § 36-36-45; Code 1981, § 36-36-55, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority to pass local Acts. - Provisions of Ga. L. 1970, p. 426, § 1 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-36-50 et seq.) do not take away legislative authority to pass local Acts annexing territory to municipal corporations. These sections provide an alternative method to the continuing power of the General Assembly to extend or diminish the corporate limits of a municipality. Ballentine v. Willingham, 237 Ga. 60, 226 S.E.2d 593, appeal dismissed, 429 U.S. 909, 97 S. Ct. 298, 50 L. Ed. 2d 276 (1976).

36-36-56. Plans and report for extension of services to area proposed to be annexed.

Statute text

(a) A municipal corporation exercising authority under this article shall make plans for the extension of services to the area proposed to be annexed and, prior to the public hearing provided for in Code Section 36-36-57, shall prepare a report setting forth its plans to provide services to such area.

(b) The report required in subsection (a) of this Code section shall include:

(1) A map or maps of the municipal corporation and adjacent territory, showing the present and proposed boundaries of the municipal corporation, the present major trunk water mains and sewer interceptors and outfalls, the proposed extensions of such mains and outfalls as required in paragraph (3) of this subsection, and the general land use pattern in the area to be annexed;
